Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-403
Warrant; who may issue.

Judges of the district court and judges of the county court shall have power to issue process for the apprehension of any person charged with a criminal offense. Clerk magistrates shall have the power to issue such process as provided in section 24-519.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 285, p. 789;

R.S.1913, § 8939;

C.S.1922, § 9963;

C.S.1929, § 29-403;

R.S.1943, § 29-403;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 166;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 51;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 28.